Montana, session 2025, HB425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Liability of peace officer for damages and injuries caused by illegal
search or illegal entry into property. A peace officer as defined in 45-2-101 or the law enforcement agency
employing the peace officer is liable for all property damage and injuries to the occupants:
(1) caused by entry into the wrong dwelling or other building from what is specified in a search
warrant;
(2) caused by pursuing a suspect into the dwelling or other building of a person who is not the
suspect; or
(3) caused when a suspect takes the occupants of a dwelling or other building hostage in the
apprehension or attempted apprehension of the suspect.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 27, chapter 1, part 7, and the provisions of Title 27, chapter 1, part 7, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 425